Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 5 Pretrial Release and Diversion Programs

Editor’s notes.

Section 3 of the 1984 Act that enacted this article provided as follows: “Provided, however, no person shall be released on his own recognizance or approved for said program, without first having the approval, in writing, of the judge of the court having jurisdiction of the case.” This section of the 1984 Act was not codified by the General Assembly. See, however, Code Section 42-8-84, part of a 1985 Act to correct errors and omissions in the Code.

42-8-80 through 42-8-84.
[Reserved]

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-80

through 42-8-83, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 367, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 708, § 17; Ga. L. 1996, p. 748, § 23; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1643, § 3-4; Code 1981, § 42-8-84, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 42; repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-78/HB 310, effective July 1, 2015.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-78/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”